Utah statutes.
11-50-201.   Certification by chief administrative officer and chief financial officer required.

For an annual financial report of a political subdivision to be considered complete on and after July 1, 2013, the following certifications shall be included with the annual financial report:

(1)  Under penalty of perjury, I, [officer's name] certify that the [annual financial report] of [political subdivision] for the year ended [date] fairly presents in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of [political subdivision].

[signature], Chief Administrative Officer.

(2)  Under penalty of perjury, I, [officer's name] certify that the [annual financial report] of [political subdivision] for the year ended [date] fairly presents in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of [political subdivision].

[signature], Chief Financial Officer.



Enacted by Chapter 367, 2013 General Session

